Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2480.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 38-2 of the General Laws entitled "Access to Public Records" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
38-2-17. Traffic accidents and improvement data.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter or state law, any records that, under
23 U.S.C. § 407, are not discoverable or admissible in court proceedings or allowed to be
considered for other purposes in damage actions shall nonetheless be deemed public records;
provided, however, the records may not be used for purposes prohibited by that federal statute.
When making the record public, whether in response to a request pursuant to this chapter, or
otherwise, a public body may provide written notice of the aforementioned restrictions on their use.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004452
========